Alaska statutes. Title 40. Public Records and Recorders.
Article 2. Personal Information in State Public Records.

Sec. 40.25.300.
Notice regarding personal information.

When a state agency requests personal information that may be included in a public record directly from the person who is the subject of the information, the agency shall give the person a written notice at the time of the request that states

the name and address of the agency;

the citation of the statute or regulation that authorizes the agency to request the information;

a statement indicating whether the person is required to supply the information;

the consequences to the person, if any, of not providing all or part of the requested information;

a statement of the agency’s anticipated uses of the information, including the agency’s internal uses of the information and disclosure of the information to other state agencies;

the fact that the information may be subject to inspection and copying under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

; and

a statement summarizing how a person may challenge under AS

40.25.310

the accuracy or completeness of personal information maintained by a state agency.

An agency may provide the written notice required under (a) of this section by

placing the notice on the form used to request the information from the person;

giving the person the notice on a separate sheet that accompanies the form used to request the information from the person;

giving the person a statement in a pamphlet, booklet, manual, or other printed matter at the time the information on the person is requested; or

prominently posting a sign containing the notice in a prominent location so that the sign can be easily observed and read by the person at the time the information is requested.

This section does not apply to a request for information on a person if

the request is made by a peace officer; in this paragraph, “peace officer” has the meaning given in AS

01.10.060

;

the person is the agency’s employee;

the information is related to litigation;

the information is being collected by a public agency when investigating a possible violation of law; or

the information is not subject to inspection and copying under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

, even if the information is eventually subject to inspection and copying under AS

18.50.310(f)

.

History.

(§ 15 ch 200 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as
AS

44.99.020

. Renumbered as
AS

44.99.300

in 1990 and renumbered again in 2004. In 2004, in (a)(7), “AS

40.25.310

” was substituted for “AS 44.99.310” to reflect the 2004 renumbering of
AS 44.99.310.

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.120” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.120.

Cross references. —

For exception to this section for motor vehicle records, see AS

28.10.505

.

Sec. 40.25.310.
Information accuracy and completeness.

A person who is the subject of personal information that is maintained by a state agency and subject to public disclosure under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

may challenge the accuracy or completeness of the personal information.

To challenge the accuracy or completeness of personal information under (a) of this section, the person must file with the state agency a written request that the personal information be changed. The request must provide

a description of the challenged personal information;

the changes necessary to make the personal information accurate or complete; and

the person’s name and the address where the department may contact the person.

Within 30 days after receiving a written request made under (b) of this section, the state agency may request verification of the disputed personal information from the person who made the request.

Within 30 days after receiving the written request under (b) of this section or the verification under (c) of this section, the state agency shall review the request and

change the personal information according to the request and notify the person in writing of the change; or

deny the request and notify the person in writing of the reasons for the decision and the name, title, and business address of the person who denied the request.

If a request is denied under (d) of this section, the person may provide to the state agency a concise written statement that states the person’s reasons for disagreeing with the decision. The state agency shall maintain in its records the request made under (b) of this section and the statement provided by the person under this subsection. On all of the state agency’s records that contain the disputed information, the state agency shall clearly note which portions of the records are disputed. If the record is in electronic form, the state agency may note the dispute in one field of the electronic form and maintain the other information about the dispute in paper form.

This section does not apply to criminal intelligence or criminal investigative records, criminal justice information under AS 12.62, state agency personnel or retirement system records, records of applicants for employment with the state agency, or information in documents recorded under AS 40.17.

History.

(§ 15 ch 200 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 118 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

44.99.030

. Renumbered as AS 44.99.310 in 1990 and renumbered again in 2004.

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

.

Sec. 40.25.350.
Definitions.

In AS

40.25.300

—

40.25.350

,

“person” means an individual;

“personal information” means information that can be used to identify a person and from which judgments can be made about a person’s character, habits, avocations, finances, occupation, general reputation, credit, health, or other personal characteristics, but does not include a person’s name, address, or telephone number, if the number is published in a current telephone directory, or information describing a public job held by a person;

“state agency”

means a department, institution, board, commission, division, authority, public corporation, committee, or other administrative unit of the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of state government, including the University of Alaska;

does not include the Alaska Railroad Corporation.

History.

(§ 15 ch 200 SLA 1990; am § 134 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

44.99.040

. Renumbered as AS 44.99.310 in 1990 and renumbered again in 2004. In 2004, “AS 40.24.300 —

40.25.350

” was substituted for “AS

44.99.300

— 44.99.350” to reflect the 2004 renumbering of AS

44.99.300

— 44.99.350.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The definition of “personal information” is an implicit statement by the legislature that it does not consider a person’s name and address to be protected by the right to privacy. Therefore, a person’s name and address are subject to disclosure under AS 09.25.110 and 09.25.120 (now AS

40.25.110

and

40.25.120

). April 1, 1992 Op. Att’y Gen.